test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IID_gt-norm.yaml
     gisíid+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: gisíid
     gisíid+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gisíida
     gisíid+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gisíid
     gisíid+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gisíidang
     gisíid+V+DIRECT+PAST: gisíidan
     gisíid+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gisíidaa
     gisíid+V+INDIRECT+PAST: gisíidaan
     gisíid+V+RELATIVE: gisíids
     gisíid+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: gisíidaas
     gisíid+V+NON_FACTIVE: gisíidang
     gisíid+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: gisíidaa.ang
     gisíid+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gisíidang
     gisíid+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gisíidanggang
     gisíid+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: gisíidangang
     gisíid+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíidiinii
     gisíid+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíidaangaa
     gisíid+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíidaangaan
     gisíid+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: gisíidäsaa
     gisíid+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: gisíidäs
     gisíid+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: gisíidäsaang
     gisíid+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: gisíidäsga
     gisíid+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: gisíidäsaas
     gisíid+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: gisíidäsaa.ang
     gisíid+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gisíidang k̲asa'áa
     gisíid+V+NEAR+FUTURE: gisíidang k̲asa'áang
     gisíid+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gisíidang k̲asaasdláa
     gisíid+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gisíidang k̲asaasdláang
     gisíid+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gisíid'uuj
     gisíid+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gisíid'uujang
     gisíid+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: gisíidäsaa'uujang
     gisíid+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: gisíid'us
     gisíid+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gisíid'ujaa
     gisíid+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'uujaangaa
     gisíid+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: gisíidäsaa'us
     gisíid+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: gisíid'ahlanggang
     gisíid+V+CERTAIN+PAST: gisíid'ahlanggan
     gisíid+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'ahlanggiinii
     gisíid+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: gisíidäsaa'ahlans
     gisíid+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: gisíid'ahlans
     gisíid+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: gisíidaa'ahlang
     gisíid+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: gisíidaa'ahlanggaa
     gisíid+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: gisíidaa'ahlanggang
     gisíid+V+REFLEXIVE: gisíid'ahl
     gisíid+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: gisíidäseehl
     gisíid+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: gisíid'uu
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gisíid'waa
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gisíid'waa
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gisíid'waang
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: gisíid'wägan
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gisíid'aawaa
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: gisíid'aawaan
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: gisíid'waas
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: gisíid'aawaas
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: gisíid'waa.ang
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: gisíid'aawaa.ang
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gisíidang'waa
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gisíidang'waang
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: gisíidang'waa.ang
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'wägiinii
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'wägaangaa
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'wägaangaan
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: gisíid'waaäsaa
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: gisíid'waaäs
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: gisíid'waaäsaang
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: gisíid'waaäsga
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: gisíid'waaäsaas
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: gisíid'waaäsaa.ang
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gisíid'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: gisíid'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gisíid'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gisíid'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gisíid'waa'uuj
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gisíid'waa'uujang
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: gisíid'waaäsaa'uujang
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: gisíid'waa'us
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gisíid'waa'ujaa
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'waa'uujaangaa
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: gisíid'waaäsaa'us
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: gisíid'waa'ahlanggang
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: gisíid'waa'ahlanggan
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'waa'ahlanggiinii
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: gisíid'waaäsaa'ahlans
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: gisíid'waa'ahlans
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: gisíid'aawaa'ahlang
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: gisíid'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: gisíid'aawaa'ahlanggang
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: gisíid'waa'ahl
     gisíid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: gisíid'waaäseehl
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: gisíid'ang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gisíid'angga
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gisíid'ang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gisíid'anggang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: gisíid'anggan
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gisíid'aangaa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: gisíid'aangaan
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: gisíid'ans
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: gisíid'aangaas
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: gisíid'angang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: gisíid'aangaa.ang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gisíid'anggang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gisíidang'anggang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: gisíidang'angang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'anggiinii
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'anggaangaa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'anggaangaan
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: gisíid'angäsaa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: gisíid'angäs
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: gisíid'angäsaang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: gisíid'angäsga
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: gisíid'angäsaas
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: gisíid'angäsaa.ang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gisíidang k̲asaa'áng
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gisíidang k̲asaa'ánggang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gisíidang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gisíidang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gisíid'ang'uuj
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gisíid'ang'uujang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: gisíid'angäsaa'uujang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: gisíid'ang'us
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gisíid'ang'ujaa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'ang'uujaangaa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: gisíid'angäsaa'us
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: gisíid'aang'ahlanggang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: gisíid'aang'ahlanggan
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'aang'ahlanggiinii
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: gisíid'angäsaa'ahlans
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: gisíid'aang'ahlans
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: gisíid'aangaa'ahlang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: gisíid'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: gisíid'aangaa'ahlanggang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: gisíid'aang'ahl
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: gisíid'angäseehl
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: gisíid'ang'uu
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gisíid'ang'waa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gisíid'ang'waa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gisíid'ang'waang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: gisíid'ang'wägan
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gisíid'ang'aawaa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: gisíid'ang'aawaan
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: gisíid'ang'waas
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: gisíid'ang'aawaas
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: gisíid'ang'waa.ang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: gisíid'ang'aawaa.ang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gisíidang'ang'waa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gisíidang'ang'waang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: gisíidang'ang'waa.ang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'ang'wägiinii
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'ang'wägaangaa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'ang'wägaangaan
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: gisíid'ang'waaäsaa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: gisíid'ang'waaäs
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: gisíid'ang'waaäsaang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: gisíid'ang'waaäsga
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: gisíid'ang'waaäsaas
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: gisíid'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gisíid'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: gisíid'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gisíid'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gisíid'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gisíid'ang'waa'uuj
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gisíid'ang'waa'uujang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: gisíid'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: gisíid'ang'waa'us
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gisíid'ang'waa'ujaa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: gisíid'ang'waaäsaa'us
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: gisíid'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: gisíid'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: gisíid'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: gisíid'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: gisíid'ang'waa'ahlans
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: gisíid'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: gisíid'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: gisíid'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: gisíid'ang'waa'ahl
     gisíid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: gisíid'ang'waaäseehl
